District of Columbia statutes.
5-542.02

Additional compensation for helicopter pilot, bomb disposal, or scuba diving duty.

Each officer or member of the Metropolitan Police Force, including, notwithstanding any other law or regulation, each officer or member appointed pursuant to § 1-610.72, and United States Park Police force assigned on or after the effective date of the District of Columbia Police and Firemen’s Salary Act Amendments of 1972: (1) to perform the duty of a helicopter pilot; or (2) to render explosive devices ineffective or to otherwise dispose of such devices shall receive, in addition to his scheduled rate of basic compensation, $2,270 per annum, except in the case of an officer or member of the United States Park Police, who shall receive a per annum amount equal to 7 percent of the sum of such officer’s or member’s rate of basic compensation plus locality pay adjustments, so long as he remains in such assignment. Further, each officer or member of the metropolitan police force assigned on or after August 29, 1972, to the Harbor Patrol division within the Metropolitan Police Department as scuba divers shall receive in addition to his or her scheduled rate of basic compensation, $2,710 per annum so long as he or she remains in such assignment. The additional compensation authorized by this section shall be paid to an officer or member in the same manner as he is paid basic compensation to which he is entitled, except that when such an officer or member ceases to be in such an assignment, the loss of such additional compensation shall not constitute an adverse action for the purposes of § 7511 et seq. of Title 5 of the United States Code. No officer or member who receives the additional compensation authorized by this section may receive additional compensation under § 5-543.02.

Aug. 1, 1958, 72 Stat. 483, Pub. L. 85-584, title II, § 202
Sept. 2, 1964, 78 Stat. 881, Pub. L. 88-575, title I, § 103
Aug. 29, 1972, 86 Stat. 636, Pub. L. 92-410, title I, § 104
Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1036, Pub. L. 93-407, title I, § 101(a)(2), (3)
Nov. 15, 1977, 91 Stat. 1371, Pub. L. 95-179
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-252, § 2, 46 DCR 1127
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 103(b), 47 DCR 4619
Dec. 21, 2000, 114 Stat. 2763, Pub. L. 106-554, § 1(a)(4), H.R. 5666 § 906(b)
Oct. 15, 2010, 124 Stat. 3033, Pub. L. 111-282, § 4(b)(2)(A)
This section is referenced in § 5-545.06a.
1981 Ed., § 4-408.
1973 Ed., § 4-825.
D.C. Law 13-160, after “Metropolitan Police Force”, added “including, notwithstanding any other law or regulation, each officer or member appointed pursuant to § 1-611.72,”.
Pub. L. 111-282 deleted “United States Secret Service Uniformed Division, ” preceding “and United States Park Police force”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-61, October 12, 1999, law notification 47 DCR 1983).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Clarifying Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-102, January 10, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 4339).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-137, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6802).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-175, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9236).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Clarifying Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-231, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 506).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-305, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2701).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(g) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-137, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6802).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(g) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-175, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9236).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(g) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Clarifying Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-231, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 506).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3(g) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-305, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2701).
The effective date of the Police and Firemen’s Salary Act Amendments of 1972, referred to in the first sentence of this section, is prescribed by § 118 of the Act of August 29, 1972, 86 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 92-410.